District of Columbia statutes.
8-412

Enforcement.

(a)

For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter, the Mayor may enter upon any public or private land in a reasonable and lawful manner during normal business hours for purposes of sampling, inspection, and observation.

(b)

If denied access to any land, the Mayor may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for a search warrant.

(c)

The Mayor, or any person, may bring an action in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia to enjoin the violation or threatened violation of any provision of this chapter or of any rules or regulation promulgated thereto.

Apr. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-70, § 13, 24 DCR 6867

History

1981 Ed., § 6-751.12.

Prior Codifications